Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2896.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-231, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-231. Department of education A. There is created a department of education. B. The department shall be administered through: 1. The state board of education, which shall be the policy-determining body of the department. 2. The superintendent of public instruction, in whom all executive, administrative and ministerial functions of the department are vested and who is the executive officer responsible for the execution of policies of the state board of education. C. In addition to any divisions established by law, the superintendent of public instruction may establish such divisions as in the judgment of the superintendent of public instruction are necessary for the proper transaction of the business of the department. D. The department shall be conducted under the control of the superintendent of public instruction. E. The superintendent of public instruction shall establish a tribal education liaison office within the department of education.  The office shall: 1. To the maximum extent possible and subject to the requirements prescribed by the family educational rights and privacy act (20 United States code section 1232g), review all student data that is received or collected by the department and disaggregate the data for students who are members of a federally recognized Indian tribe or who identify as native american. 2. Consult with federally recognized Indian tribes in this state to determine policies and guidelines relating to the requirements prescribed by paragraph 1 of this subsection. 3. Attempt to enter into a memorandum of understanding with one or more federally recognized Indian tribes in this state relating to culturally appropriate uses of data that is disaggregated pursuant to paragraph 1 of this subsection. END_STATUTE